Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1991
Duties and authority of officers.

Each officer has the authority and shall perform the duties set forth in the bylaws or, to the extent consistent with the bylaws, the duties and authority prescribed in a resolution of the board or by direction of an officer authorized by the board to prescribe the duties and authority of other officers.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 91.